Utah statutes.
58-74-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
Grounds for refusing to issue a license to an applicant, for refusing to renew
the license of a licensee, for revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing
on probation the license of a licensee, for issuing a public or private
reprimand to a licensee, and for issuing a cease and desist order shall be in
accordance with Sections 58-1-401 and 78A-2-404.
